Utah statutes.
57-14-5.   Land leased to state or political subdivision for recreational purposes.

Unless otherwise agreed in writing, Sections 57-14-3 and 57-14-4 are applicable to the duties and liability of an owner of land leased to the state or any subdivision of the state for recreational purposes.



Amended by Chapter 62, 1997 General Session

